Utah statutes.
78B-11-113.   Disclosure by arbitrator.
(1)  Before accepting appointment, an individual who is requested to serve as
an arbitrator, after making a reasonable inquiry, shall disclose to all
parties to the agreement to arbitrate and arbitration proceeding and to any
other arbitrators any known facts that a reasonable person would consider
likely to affect the impartiality of the arbitrator in the arbitration
proceeding, including:
(a)  a financial or personal interest in the outcome of the arbitration
proceeding; and
(b)  an existing or past relationship with any of the parties to the agreement
to arbitrate or the arbitration proceeding, their counsel or representatives,
a witness, or another arbitrator.
(2)  An arbitrator has a continuing obligation to disclose to all parties to
the agreement to arbitrate and arbitration proceeding and to any other
arbitrators any facts that the arbitrator learns after accepting appointment
which a reasonable person would consider likely to affect the impartiality of
the arbitrator.
(3)  If an arbitrator discloses a fact required by Subsection (1) or (2) to be
disclosed and a party timely objects to the appointment or continued service
of the arbitrator based upon the fact disclosed, the objection may be a ground
under Subsection 78B-11-124(1)(b) for vacating an award made by the
arbitrator.
(4)  If the arbitrator did not disclose a fact as required by Subsection (1)
or (2), upon timely objection by a party, the court under Subsection
78B-11-124(1)(b) may vacate an award.
(5)  An arbitrator appointed as a neutral arbitrator who does not disclose a
known, direct, and material interest in the outcome of the arbitration
proceeding or a known, existing, and substantial relationship with a party is
presumed to act with evident partiality under Subsection 78B-11-124(1)(b).
(6)  If the parties to an arbitration proceeding agree to the procedures of an
arbitration organization or any other procedures for challenges to arbitrators
before an award is made, substantial compliance with those procedures is a
condition precedent to a motion to vacate an award on that ground under
Subsection 78B-11-124(1)(b).
